Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.456

Grain indemnity fund program—Additional payment limitations.

In addition to the payment limitations imposed by RCW 22.09.451, payment of any claim approved before the grain indemnity fund first reaches a balance of one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars, shall be limited to the following amounts:

(1) For claims against a licensed grain warehouse, payment shall not exceed the lesser of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars or an amount equal to the licensee's total bushels of licensed storage space multiplied by the rate of eighteen cents.

(2) For claims against a licensed grain dealer, payment shall not exceed the lesser of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars or an amount equal to six percent of the gross purchases of the licensee during the licensee's immediately preceding fiscal year.

(3) The unpaid balance of any claim subject to this section shall be paid when the grain indemnity fund first reaches a balance of one million two hundred fifty thousand dollars, provided that the total paid on the claim shall not exceed the limits specified in RCW 22.09.451.

[ 1987 c 509 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.